Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-109
Terms not defined, how construed; titles, treatment.

Except where a word, term or phrase is specially defined, all words used in this code are to be taken and construed in the sense in which they are understood in common language, taking into consideration the context and subject matter relative to which they are employed. The titles merely, to the various chapters, articles, sections or clauses of this code, which are written or printed upon the bill at the time of its approval, shall constitute no part thereof.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 254, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8909;

C.S.1922, § 9930;

C.S.1929, § 29-109;

R.S.1943, § 29-109.

It is a simple rule of statutory construction that terms which are not specifically defined are to be taken in the sense in which they are understood in common language. State v. Holman, 229 Neb. 57, 424 N.W.2d 627 (1988).

Related context and subject matter must be considered in construing penal statute. State v. Neal, 187 Neb. 413, 191 N.W.2d 458 (1971).

Terms must be taken and construed in the sense in which they are understood in common language. Wirth v. Calhoun, 64 Neb. 316, 89 N.W. 785 (1902).